Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.201

City council—Meetings—Journal.

All meetings of the council shall be presided over by the mayor, or, in the mayor's absence, by the mayor pro tempore. The mayor shall have a vote only in the case of a tie in the votes of the councilmembers. If the clerk is absent from a council meeting, the mayor or mayor pro tempore shall appoint one of the members of the council as clerk pro tempore. The appointment of a councilmember as mayor pro tempore or clerk pro tempore shall not in any way abridge the councilmember's right to vote upon all questions coming before the council.

The clerk shall keep a correct journal of all proceedings and at the desire of any member the ayes and noes shall be taken on any question and entered in the journal.

[ 1994 c 81 s 42; 1965 c 107 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.24.200. Prior: (i) 1915 c 184 s 13, part; 1890 p 182 s 115; RRS s 9126, part. (ii) 1915 c 184 s 11, part; 1891 c 156 s 2; 1890 p 182 s 114; RRS s 9124, part. Formerly RCW 35.24.200.]